Utah statutes.
58-83-301.   Licensure required -- Issuance of licenses.

(1)  Beginning July 1, 2010, and except as provided in Section 58-1-307:

(a)  a physician licensed under Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, shall be licensed under this chapter to engage in the delivery of online pharmaceutical services;

(b)  an online contract pharmacy shall be licensed under this chapter to engage in the delivery of online pharmaceutical services; and

(c)  an Internet facilitator shall be licensed under this chapter to engage in the delivery of online pharmaceutical services.

(2)  The division shall issue, to any person who qualifies under this chapter, a license:

(a)  to prescribe online;

(b)  to operate as an online contract pharmacy; or

(c)  to operate as an Internet facilitator.

(3) (a)  A license under this chapter is not required to engage in electronic prescribing under Chapter 82, Electronic Prescribing Act; and

(b)  nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a physician licensed under Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, from electronic prescribing or Internet prescribing as permitted by Chapter 67 or 68, or other law.

